Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 1 Public Utilities Commission
39-1-32.
Emergency powers of commission.

Any general or public law notwithstanding, the commission, when it determines that public safety so requires, or that failure to act immediately will result in irreparable injury to the public interest, or that an emergency exists in the financial affairs of a public utility which, if not met immediately, will interfere with the accommodations, convenience, and welfare of the people, may issue an order effective immediately, but for temporary duration, until formal notice be given and a hearing had of the parties in interest.

The superior court, upon the filing of a complaint sworn to by two (2) or more commissioners setting forth that a public utility has ceased, or that there is imminent danger of a public utility ceasing to provide service to its customers, and that in their opinion public safety requires that immediate action be taken to avoid irreparable injury to the public welfare or safety, shall forthwith issue a citation to the company to be served in such manner as the court shall direct, commanding the company to appear before the court on a day and in a place to be mentioned in the citation, then and there to show cause, if any it has, why a receiver of the company with all the powers and rights of a receiver in equity should not be appointed. Within a time to be fixed by the court, the receiver so appointed shall propose a plan for reorganization of the company, which plan shall be fair and equitable to all creditors and stockholders of the company, and protect the welfare and safety of the public. Upon the filing of the plan, the court shall order a hearing on the plan at such time and subject to such notice as may be provided in the order. At the hearing the court shall enter such decree as may be appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1.

39-1-33.
Reports.

The commission and division shall make reports due on the first day of June and the first day of December to the governor for transmittal to the general assembly, which shall contain summaries of every rate-case hearing, and/or order of the commission and division occurring in the period immediately preceding the first day of June and the first day of December.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 9; P.L. 1929, ch. 1394, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-9

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-33

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 103.

39-1-34.
Disposition of fees.

All fees charged and collected by the division shall belong to the state and shall be paid into the state treasury monthly, by the administrator, accompanied by a detailed statement thereof, and become part of the general funds of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 9; P.L. 1929, ch. 1394, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-8

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-34

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1.

39-1-35.
Conflict of interest.

A person, or his or her or dependent child, spouse, of any person, who is, or has been in the past one year, in the employ of or holding any official relation to any company subject to the supervision of the commission, or engaged in the management of the company, or owning stock, bonds, or other securities thereof, or who is, or has been in the past one year, in any manner, connected with the operation of the company in this state, shall not be a commissioner or clerk of the commission; nor shall any commissioner or clerk of the commission, personally or in connection with a partner or agent, render professional service for or against or make or perform any business contract with any company subject to the supervision, relating to the business of the company, except contracts made with them as common carriers, or in regular course of public service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-36.
Offices of commission and division.

The department of administration shall furnish the commission with suitable offices, quarters in which to hold its meetings and transact its business, and a properly appointed hearing room adequate to accommodate the public, witnesses, stenographers, and the commissioners and their clerks. The department of administration shall furnish the division with offices suitably located for the convenience of the public and properly equipped for keeping its records, maps, and documents and for the efficient use of its library.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-4

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-36

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-37.
“Public utility administrator” defined — Continuity of functions.

Wherever in any general or public law the words “public utility administrator” appears, the same words shall be deemed to refer to and mean administrator of the division of public utilities and carriers. The governor is authorized to transfer or reallocate, by executive order, the whole or any part of the appropriations for the public utility administrator or commission, to the commission or the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 335, § 6; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-37.1.
Ratepayers advisory board.

There is hereby established the ratepayers advisory board. The advisory board shall consist of the following public members:

Four (4) members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one of whom shall represent the interests of residential ratepayers; one of whom shall represent the interests of the elderly and disabled; one of whom shall represent a community-based consumer organization representing low-income individuals; and one of whom shall represent a LIHEAP consumer.

Four (4) members appointed by the senate president, one of whom shall represent the interests of residential ratepayers; one of whom shall represent a chamber of commerce; one of whom shall represent a nonprofit energy consortium of businesses; and one of whom shall represent a community action agency LIHEAP program provider.

Three (3) members appointed by the governor, one of whom shall represent the LIHEAP program administration; one of whom shall represent the interests of small business owners; and one of whom shall represent the interests of residents of affordable housing.

The appointments to the advisory board shall be made as follows: each appointing authority shall appoint one member to serve a term of one year, one member to serve a term of two (2) years, and one member to serve a term of three (3) years. Thereafter, each member appointed to the advisory board shall serve a three-year (3) term. The board members are eligible to succeed themselves. A vacancy, other than by expiration of a term, shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment, but only for the unexpired portion of the term.

Five (5) members shall constitute a quorum. A majority vote of the board shall be required for all recommendations, advice, and approvals of the board, in accordance with this section.

A board member shall not receive compensation for his or her service on the board but may receive reimbursement for travel and other necessary expenses, while engaged in the performance of official duties of the board.

The board shall elect annually a chairperson and vice chairperson from among its membership.

The board shall receive staff and administrative support from the division, to organize meetings and take and distribute minutes. The division shall also furnish the advisory board a suitable location to hold its meetings.

The board shall meet at least quarterly and at the call of the chairperson or four (4) board members. The administrator shall be present for all board meetings to inform the board of the actions of the division and to respond to the board’s inquiries.

The board shall review legislative proposals and comment on existing state laws relating to residential ratepayers.

The board shall advise the administrator on matters concerning residential ratepayers including, but not limited to utility shutoff policies, rate affordability, conservation measures, consumer education, smart meters and/or restricted use meters, customer service charges, legislation pending before the general assembly, and legislative initiatives.

The advisory board shall issue an annual report of findings, including recommendations on current or proposed state programs, policies, regulations, and laws, to the governor and the general assembly.

The board shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 2 of title 38, access to public records act, and chapter 46 of title 42, open meetings act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 382, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 404, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 521, § 1.

39-1-38.
Liberal construction — Incidental powers — Severability.

The provisions of this title shall be interpreted and construed liberally in aid of its declared purpose. The commission and the division shall have, in addition to powers specified in this chapter, all additional, implied, and incidental power that may be proper or necessary to effectuate their purposes. No rule, order, act, or regulation of the commission and of the division shall be declared inoperative, illegal, or void for any omission of a technical nature. If any provision of this title, or of any rule or regulation made thereunder, or the application thereof to any company or circumstance, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the title, rule, or regulation, and the application of the provision to other companies or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this title shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 58; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 56; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 53; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-17

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-38

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 103; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 2.

39-1-39.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 122, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1, effective August 7, 1996.

39-1-40.
Toll-free telephone service for complaints.

The division shall maintain a toll-free telephone service where any consumer in Rhode Island may register an initial complaint against any public utility or nonregulated power producer. This toll-free telephone service may also be used by cable television subscribers for the purpose stated above.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 533, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-41.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 22, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1, effective August 7, 1996.

39-1-42.
Access to telephone information services for persons with disabilities.

The public utilities commission shall establish, administer, and promote an information accessibility service that includes:

A statewide telephone relay service and, through the competitive bidding process, contract for the administration and operation of such a relay system for utilization of the telecommunications network by persons who are deaf, hard of hearing, and speech impaired;

The adaptive telephone equipment loan program capable of servicing the needs of persons who are deaf, hard of hearing, severely speech impaired, or those with neuromuscular impairments for use with a single-party telephone line, or wireless telephone, to any subscriber who is certified as deaf, hard of hearing, severely speech impaired, or with neuromuscular impairments by a licensed physician, audiologist, speech pathologist, or a qualified state agency, pursuant to chapter 23 of this title; and

A telephone access to the text of newspaper programs to residents who are blind, deaf or blind, visually impaired, or reading impaired with a single-party telephone line.

The commission shall establish, by rule or regulation, an appropriate funding mechanism to recover the costs of providing this service from each residence and business telephone access line or trunk in the state, including PBX trunks and centrex equivalent trunks and each service line or trunk, and upon each user interface number or extension number or similarly identifiable line, trunk, or path to or from a digital network. Notwithstanding the foregoing, there shall not be any additional funding mechanism used to charge each residence and business telephone access line or trunk in the state, including PBX trunks and centrex equivalent trunks and each service line or trunk, or upon each user interface number or extension number or similarly identifiable line, trunk, or path to or from a digital network, to recover the costs of providing the services outlined in subsection (a)(1), (2) or (3) above.

The commission, with the assistance of the state commission on the deaf and hard of hearing, shall also develop the appropriate rules, regulations, and service standards necessary to implement the provisions of subsection (a)(1). At a minimum, however, the commission shall require, under the terms of the contract, that the relay service provider:

Offer its relay services seven (7) days a week, twenty-four (24) hours a day, including holidays;

Hire only qualified salaried operators with deaf language skills; and

Maintain the confidentiality of all communications.

The commission shall collect from the telecommunications service providers the amounts of the surcharge collected from their subscribers and remit to the department of human services an additional ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually commencing in fiscal year 2005 for the adaptive telephone equipment loan program and forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to the department of human services for the establishment of a new telephone access to the text of newspaper programs. In addition, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall annually be remitted to the Rhode Island commission on the deaf and hard of hearing for an emergency and public communication access program, pursuant to §

23-1.8-4

. The surcharge referenced hereunder shall be generated from existing funding mechanisms and shall not be generated as a result of any new funding mechanisms charged to each residence and business telephone access line or trunk in the state, including PBX trunks and centrex equivalent trunks and each service line or trunk, or upon each user interface number or extension number or similarly identifiable line, trunk, or path to or from a digital network.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 378, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 504, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 2, § 6, effective July 1, 2022.

39-1-43.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-44.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-45.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-46.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-47.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-48.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-49.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-50.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-51.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-52.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-53.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-54.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-55.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-56.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-57.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1, P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 9; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-58.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-59.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 9; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-60.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 19, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 19, 2017.

39-1-61.
Rhode Island telecommunications education access fund.

Preamble. For the past ten (10) years, the schools and libraries of Rhode Island have benefited from a regulatory agreement with Verizon and its predecessor companies that has provided up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) annually for support of telecommunications lines for internet access. In addition, the funds provided for in the original regulatory agreement and every dollar generated hereunder leverages a one dollar and twenty-seven cents ($1.27) federal E-Rate match. With the regulatory agreement approaching its termination and the advent of more advanced technologies, it is the intent of this section to provide a continued source of funding for internet access for eligible public and private schools and libraries.

Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

“Department” means the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education.

“Division” means the division of public utilities and carriers.

“Telecommunications education access fund” means the programs and funding made available to qualified libraries and schools to assist in paying the costs of acquiring, installing, and using telecommunications technologies to access the internet.

Purpose. The purpose of the telecommunications education access fund shall be to fund a basic level of internet connectivity for all of the qualified schools (kindergarten through grade 12) and libraries in the state.

Authority. The division shall establish, by rule or regulation, an appropriate funding mechanism to recover from the general body of ratepayers the costs of providing telecommunications technology to access the internet.

The general assembly shall determine the amount of a monthly surcharge to be levied upon each residence and business telephone access line or trunk in the state, including PBX trunks and centrex equivalent trunks and each service line or trunk, and upon each user interface number or extension number or similarly identifiable line, trunk, or path to or from a digital network. The department will provide the general assembly with information and recommendations regarding the necessary level of funding to effectuate the purposes of this section. The surcharge shall be billed by each telecommunications services provider and shall be payable to the telecommunications services provider by the subscriber of the telecommunications services. State, local, and quasi-governmental agencies shall be exempt from the surcharge. The surcharge shall be deposited in a restricted-receipt account, hereby created within the department of elementary and secondary education and known as the telecommunications education access fund, to pay any and all costs associated with subsection (b)(3). The amount of the surcharge shall not exceed thirty-five cents ($.35) per access line or trunk.

The surcharge is hereby determined to be twenty-six cents ($.26) per access line or trunk.

The amount of the surcharge shall not be subject to the sales and use tax imposed under chapter 18 of title 44 nor be included within the gross earnings of the telecommunications corporation providing telecommunications service for the purpose of computing the tax under chapter 13 of title 44.

Administration. The division, with input from the department, shall administer the telecommunications education access fund consistent with the requirements of the Universal Service (E-Rate) program. The division of taxation shall collect from the telecommunications service providers the amounts of the surcharge collected from their subscribers. The department, with the approval of the division, shall publish requests for proposals that do not favor any particular technology, evaluate competitive bids, and select products and services that best serve the internet access needs of schools and libraries. In doing so, the department shall endeavor to obtain all available E-Rate matching funds. The department is further authorized and encouraged to seek matching funds from all local, state, and federal public or private entities. The department shall approve disbursement of funds under this section in accordance with the division’s directives. Unsuccessful bids may be appealed to the division. The division shall annually review the department’s disbursements from this account to ensure that the department’s decisions do not favor any competitor.

Eligibility. All schools seeking support from the fund must be eligible for Universal Service (E-Rate) support and meet the definition of “elementary school” or “secondary school” in the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. § 8801). Schools operating as a for-profit business or with endowments exceeding fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) are not eligible for support. All libraries seeking support from the fund must meet the definition of “library” or “library consortium” in the Library Services and Technology Act, Pub. L. No. 104-208, § 211 et seq., 110 Stat. 3009 (1996) and must be eligible for assistance from a state library administrative agency under that act. Only libraries that have budgets that are completely separate from any schools (including, but not limited to, elementary and secondary, colleges and universities) shall be eligible to receive support. Libraries operating as a for-profit business shall not be eligible for support.

Effective date. The effective date of assessment for the telecommunications education access fund shall be January 1, 2004.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 40, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 2.

39-1-62.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 31, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 365, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 10; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 7, § 8; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 7, effective October 1, 2019.